Washington statutes.
RCW 35.66.030

Assistance by police.

Any person on the police force or, in their absence, any other person present, must aid and assist the matron when from necessity she may require it.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.66.030. Prior: 1893 c 15 s 2; RRS s 9283.]